District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1131.03

Reporting requirements.

Repealed.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-204, § 5, 40 DCR 1
June 13, 1996, D.C. Law 11-144, § 3(b), 43 DCR 2174
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(e), 59 DCR 1862
1981 Ed., § 1-1441.3.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 to 6 of Exploratory Committee Disclosure Informational Report and Contribution Prohibition Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-34, October 20, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 10008).

For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 2 to 6 of Exploratory Committee Disclosure Informational Report and Contribution Prohibition Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-100, June 21, 2005, 52 DCR 6086).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 2 to 6 of Exploratory Committee Disclosure Information Report and Contribution Prohibition Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-178, October 4, 2005, 52 DCR 9076).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(e) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).

Addition by Initiative 41: D.C. Law 9-204 was enacted by the electors of the District of Columbia in Initiative Measure 41.

Applicability of chapter to Law 11-144: Section 4 of D.C. Law 11-144, the Contribution Limitation Initiative Amendment Act of 1996, provided that D.C. Code § 1-1101.01 et seq. shall apply to the act. D.C. Law 11-144 repeals § 1-1104.01 and amends §§ 1-1131.01, 1-1131.03, and 1-1104.02.